Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2456
Power project agency; additional powers.

In addition to the rights and powers enumerated in sections 18-2450 to 18-2462, and in no manner limiting or restricting the same, such agency shall be deemed to be and shall have and exercise each and all of the rights and powers of a public electric light and power district or public power district within the meaning of sections 70-501 to 70-503.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 56.